Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.640

Student associations to contract for certain purchases, concessions, printing, etc.—Procedure.

The associated students of the University of Washington, the associated students of Washington State University, the student associations of the state community colleges and the student associations of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College shall contract for all purchases for printing of athletic programs, athletic tickets, athletic press brochures, yearbooks, magazines, newspapers, and letting of concessions, exceeding one thousand dollars, notice of call for bid on the same to be published in at least two newspapers of general circulation in the county wherein the institution is located two weeks prior to the award being made. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, if the price bid is fair and reasonable and not greater than the market value and price, and if the bid satisfactorily covers the quality, design, performance, convenience and reliability of service of the manufacturer and/or dealer. The aforesaid student associations may require such security as they deem proper to accompany the bids submitted, and they shall also fix the amount of the bond or other security that shall be furnished by the person to whom the contract is awarded. Such student associations may reject any or all bids submitted, if for any reason it is deemed for the best interest of their organizations to do so and readvertise in accordance with the provisions of this section. The student associations may reject the bid of any person who has had a prior contract, and who did not, in its opinion, faithfully comply with its terms: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall apply to printing done or presses owned and operated by the associated students of the University of Washington, the associated students of Washington State University or the student associations of the regional universities or of The Evergreen State College or community colleges, or to printing done on presses owned or operated by their respective institutions.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 29; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.640. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 50; 1957 c 212 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.76.390.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.